Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1019.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 49-353, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE49-353. Duties of director; rules; prohibited lead use A. The director shall: 1. Exercise general supervision over all matters related to water quality control of public water systems throughout this state. 2. Prescribe rules regarding the production, treatment, distribution and testing of potable water by public water systems, except that such rules shall not apply to irrigation, industrial or similar systems where the water is used for nonpotable purposes. The rules shall comply with at least the following: (a) The requirements established by the United States environmental protection agency for state primary enforcement responsibility of the safe drinking water act, including the requirements of 40 Code of Federal Regulations parts 141 and 142. (b) Require that the plans and specifications for all public water systems, including water treatment plants, distribution systems, distribution system extensions, water treatment methods and devices and all appurtenances and devices for sale to be used in water supplies and public water systems be submitted with a fee for review to the department. The department, in establishing fees authorized by this section, shall comply with title 41, chapter 6. The department shall not set a fee at more than the department's cost of providing the service for which the fee is charged.  State agencies are exempt from all fees imposed pursuant to this section. Monies collected from the fees shall be deposited in the water quality fee fund established by section 49-210. The director may require that plans and specifications for public water systems include programs to meet future needs for drinking water and to supply specified minimum quantities of drinking water. The director shall: (i) Require that a new public water system demonstrate that the system possesses adequate managerial and financial capacity to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. (ii) Accept adequate findings of other public authorities regarding the adequate managerial and financial capacity of a public water system to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. (c) Provide that no public water system, including a water treatment plant, distribution system, distribution system extension, water treatment method or device, appurtenance and device used in water supplies or public water systems be constructed, reconstructed, installed or initiated before compliance with the standards and rules has been demonstrated by approval of the plans and specifications by the department. The rules shall prescribe minimum standards for the bacteriological, physical and chemical quality of water distributed through public water systems. The director of environmental quality may consult with the director of the department of health services in developing these standards. (d) Provide for a simplified administrative procedure for approving structural revisions, additions, extensions or modifications to existing small public water systems for potable water serving a population of three thousand three hundred or fewer persons. (e) Exempt from the plan review requirements of this paragraph, including any requirements for approval to construct or approval of construction, any structural revisions, additions, extensions or modifications to public water systems which are in compliance with the department's rules applicable to those systems or which are making satisfactory progress towards compliance under a schedule approved by the department if either of the following conditions is satisfied: (i) The revision, addition, extension or modification has a project cost of twelve thousand five hundred dollars $12,500 or less. (ii) The revision, addition, extension or modification is made to a water line which is not for a subdivision requiring plat approval by a city, town or county, and has a project cost of more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars $12,500 but less than fifty thousand dollars $50,000, the design of which is sealed by a professional engineer who is registered in this state and the construction of which is reviewed for conformance with the design by a professional engineer. (f) Require a notice of compliance with the conditions for exemption on the completion of any revisions, additions, extensions or modifications completed in accordance with subdivision (e) of this paragraph. (g) Provide for the submission of samples at stated intervals. (h) Provide for inspection and certification of such water supplies. (i) Provide for the abatement as public nuisances of any premises, equipment, process or device, or public water system that does not comply with the minimum standards and rules. (j) Provide for records regarding water quality to be kept by owners and operators of the public water systems and that reports regarding water quality be filed with the department. (k) Provide for appropriate actions to be taken if a water supply does not meet the standards established by the department. (l) Require a public water system to implement a specified program to control contamination from backflow, backsiphonage or cross connection.  All such programs shall be consistent with section 37-1388. (m) Require that public water systems identify and provide notice to persons that may be affected by lead contamination of their drinking water where such the contamination results from either or both of the following: (i) The lead content in the construction materials of the public water distribution system. (ii) Corrosivity of the water supply sufficient to cause leaching of lead. (n) Provide for relief from water testing and monitoring requirements for public water systems qualifying under the federal safe drinking water act (P.L. 93-523; 88 Stat. 1661 1660; P.L. 95-190; 91 Stat. 1393; P.L. 104-182; 110 Stat. 1613), as amended in 1996. (o) Prohibit any person, including a political subdivision of this state, from adding fluoride into a public water system or any water that will be introduced into a public water system.  For the purposes of this subdivision, "fluoride" includes any chemical compound that contains the fluoride ion, including fluorosilicic acid, sodium fluorosilicate and sodium fluoride. 3. Develop and implement strategies to assist public water systems in acquiring and maintaining the technical, managerial and financial capacity to operate in compliance with this article and the rules adopted pursuant to this article. Assistance may be provided based on the needs of the water system. B. Pipes, pipe fittings and plumbing fittings and fixtures having a lead content in excess of a weighted average of one-quarter of one percent lead when used with respect to the wetted surfaces and solders and flux having a lead content in excess of two-tenths of one percent shall not be used in the installation or repair of public water systems or of any plumbing in residential or nonresidential facilities providing water for human consumption.  The weighted average lead content of a pipe, pipe fitting or plumbing fitting or fixture shall be calculated as follows: 1. For each wetted component, the percentage of lead in the component shall be multiplied by the ratio of the wetted surface area of that component to the total wetted surface area of the entire product to arrive at the weighted percentage of lead of the component. 2. The weighted percentage of lead of each wetted component shall be added together, and the sum of these weighted percentages shall constitute the weighted average lead content of the product. 3. The lead content of the material used to produce a wetted component shall be used to determine compliance with this subsection. 4. For lead content of materials that are provided as a range, the maximum content of that range shall be used. C. Subsection B of this section does not apply to: 1. Leaded joints necessary for the repair of cast iron pipes. 2. Pipes, pipe fittings and plumbing fittings and fixtures, including backflow preventers, that are used exclusively for nonpotable water services such as manufacturing, industrial processing, irrigation, outdoor watering or any other uses where the water is not anticipated to be used for human consumption. 3. Toilets, bidets, urinals, fill valves, flushometer valves, tub fillers, shower valves or service saddles or water distribution main gate valves that are two inches in diameter or larger. D. Notwithstanding subsection A, paragraph 2, subdivision (c) of this section, a public water system may construct, reconstruct, install, extend or initiate a water supply system, water treatment plant, distribution system, water treatment method or device, or appurtenance that is used in water supply or in a public water system when the system is out of compliance with the standards and rules adopted pursuant to this article only if the construction is necessary to correct the system's noncompliance. E. This section and the rules adopted pursuant to this section apply to public water systems as described by section 49-352, subsection B. END_STATUTE